Washington statutes.
RCW 25.10.616

Reinstatement following administrative dissolution.

A limited partnership that has been administratively dissolved may apply to the secretary of state for reinstatement in accordance with RCW 23.95.615.

[ 2015 c 176 s 6119; 2009 c 188 s 810.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.